ru: Калибр стали рамы: Калибр 10; Калибр 11; Калибр 12; Калибр 13; Калибр 14; Калибр 16; Калибр 18; Калибр 20; Калибр 7; Калибр 9; Другое
ro-RO: Cadru din oțel: Calibrul 10; Calibrul 11; Calibrul 12; Calibrul 13; Calibrul 14; Calibrul 16; Calibrul 18; Calibrul 20; Calibrul 7; Calibrul 9; Altele
de: Stahlstärke des Rahmens: 10 Gauge; 11 Gauge; 12 Gauge; 13 Gauge; 14 Gauge; 16 Gauge; 18 Gauge; 20 Gauge; 7 Gauge; 9 Gauge; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Espessura do aço da estrutura: Calibre 10; Calibre 11; Calibre 12; Calibre 13; Calibre 14; Calibre 16; Calibre 18; Calibre 20; Calibre 7; Calibre 9; Outro
vi: Độ dày thép khung: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; Khác
zh-TW: 框架鋼材厚度規格: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; 其他
da: Ståltykkelse for ramme: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; Andet
bg-BG: Дебелина на стоманата на рамката: Калибър 10; Калибър 11; Калибър 12; Калибър 13; Калибър 14; Калибър 16; Калибър 18; Калибър 20; Калибър 7; Калибър 9; Друго
pt-PT: Calibre do aço Frame: Calibre 10; Calibre 11; Calibre 12; Calibre 13; Calibre 14; Calibre 16; Calibre 18; Calibre 20; Calibre 7; Calibre 9; Outro
nl: Frame staaldikte: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; Overige
hu: Acélváz vastagsága: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; Egyéb
es: Calibre del acero del marco: Calibre 10; Calibre 11; Calibre 12; Calibre 13; Calibre 14; Calibre 16; Calibre 18; Calibre 20; Calibre 7; Calibre 9; Otro
nb: Ramme stålmåler: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; Annet
el: Πάχος χάλυβα πλαισίου: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; Άλλο
sv: Ståltjocklek för ram: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; Övrigt
it: Spessore dell'acciaio del telaio: Calibro 10; Calibro 11; Calibro 12; Calibro 13; Calibro 14; Calibro 16; Calibro 18; Calibro 20; Calibro 7; Calibro 9; Altro
tr: Çerçeve çelik kalınlığı ölçüsü: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; Diğer
en: Frame steel gauge: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; Other
lt-LT: Rėmo plieno storis: 10 kalibras; 11 kalibras; 12 kalibras; 13 kalibras; 14 kalibras; 16 kalibras; 18 kalibras; 20 kalibras; 7 kalibras; 9 kalibras; Kita
th: ความหนาของเหล็ก Frame: 10 เกจ; 11 เกจ; 12 เกจ; 13 เกจ; 14 เกจ; 16 เกจ; 18 เกจ; 20 เกจ; 7 เกจ; 9 เกจ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Debelina pločevine okvirja: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; Drugo
hr-HR: Okvir od čelika: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; Ostalo
fr: Épaisseur de l’acier du cadre: Calibre 10; Calibre 11; Calibre 12; Calibre 13; Calibre 14; Calibre 16; Calibre 18; Calibre 20; Calibre 7; Calibre 9; Autre
ja: Frame鋼板ゲージ: 10 ゲージ; 11 ゲージ; 12 ゲージ; 13 ゲージ; 14 ゲージ; 16 ゲージ; 18 ゲージ; 20 ゲージ; 7 ゲージ; 9 ゲージ; その他
sk-SK: Hrúbka ocele rámu: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; Iné
zh-CN: 车架钢材规格: 10 规格; 11 规格; 12 规格; 13 规格; 14 规格; 16 规格; 18 规格; 20 规格; 7 规格; 9 规格; 其他
fi: Teräslevyn paksuus: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; Muu
cs: Tloušťka oceli rámu: 10 gauge; 11 gauge; 12 gauge; 13 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 18 gauge; 20 gauge; 7 gauge; 9 gauge; Jiné
pl: Grubość stali ramy: Rozmiar 10; Rozmiar 11; Rozmiar 12; Rozmiar 13; Rozmiar 14; Rozmiar 16; Rozmiar 18; Rozmiar 20; Rozmiar 7; Rozmiar 9; Inny
ko: 프레임 강재 두께 등급: 10게이지; 11게이지; 12게이지; 13게이지; 14게이지; 16게이지; 18게이지; 20게이지; 7게이지; 9게이지; 기타